West Virginia, session 2025, SB417.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of Commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, modified by the Division of Natural Resources to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 3, 2024, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (prohibitions when hunting and trapping, 58 CSR 47), is authorized.